Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-111
Fines and punishments; how enforced.

All fines and punishments provided for in this code shall be enforced by the procedure provided for in this code so far as such procedure extends or can be made applicable.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 257, p. 783;

R.S.1913, § 8911;

C.S.1922, § 9932;

C.S.1929, § 29-111;

R.S.1943, § 29-111.